Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.040

Receipt of written communications.

(1) Unless otherwise agreed by the parties:

(a) Any written communication is deemed to have been received if it is delivered to the addressee personally or if it is delivered at the addressee's place of business, habitual residence, or mailing address. If none of these can be found after making a reasonable inquiry, a written communication is deemed to have been received if it is sent to the addressee's last-known place of business, habitual residence, or mailing address by registered letter or any other means which provides a record of the attempt to deliver it; and

(b) The communication is deemed to have been received on the day it is so delivered.

(2) The provisions of this section do not apply to communications in court proceedings.

[ 2015 c 276 s 4.]